src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!#####
!#Major POS's
!#####

LEXICON VERBS  !this is looking like a gateway, but not so labeled, affixes will need to be edited too
                VAI_GET ; !VAIs never take third person prefix, but a deverbal noun or a VAI in a V-N compound might -> check is applied when inflectional suffixes start
                VII_GET ;
                VAIO_DAB_ADDITIONS ; 
                VAIO ; 
                TRANS_GET ;

LEXICON VAI_GET
    VAI ;
    VAI_DAB_ADDITIONS ;

LEXICON VII_GET
    VII_DEF ; 
    VII_DAB_ADDITIONS ;

LEXICON TRANS_GET
    VTA ; 
!original vta classes
!kept in case this division is useful
!    VTA_DEF ;
!    VTA_AW ;
!    VTA_C ;
!    VTA_CW ;
!    VTA_IZHI ;
!    VTA_S ;
    VTI ;
    VTI_DAB_ADDITIONS ;
    VTA_DAB_ADDITIONS ;
!original vti class
!    VTI_AM ;

LEXICON VII_TAG
+VII:0   VII_DERIV_GATEWAY ;

LEXICON VAI_MANDATORY_REFLEXIVE
+VAI:0      VTA_DETRANSITIVE_REFLEXIVE ; 

LEXICON VAI_MANDATORY_RECIPROCAL
+VAI:0      VTA_DETRANSITIVE_RECIPROCAL ; 

LEXICON VAI_OPTIONAL_RECIPROCAL !for verbs that are particularly likely to be done as collectives
+VAI:0      VTA_DETRANSITIVE_RECIPROCAL ; 
            VAI_TAG ; 

LEXICON VAI_ENDAM_CONTINUATION
+VAI:i      VTA_DETRANSITIVE_REFLEXIVE ; !the reflexives listed for these -endam verbs end in dizo, not dzo, so we need a vowel here, as awful as that is
+VAI:i      VTA_DETRANSITIVE_RECIPROCAL ; !the reflexives listed for these -endam verbs end in dizo, not dzo, so we need a vowel here, as awful as that is
0:dam       VAI_TAG ; 

LEXICON VAI_TAG
+VAI:0       VAI_DERIV_GATEWAY ; 

LEXICON VAIO_DAB_ADDITIONS
mnezin:manezi  VAIO_TAG "1 need sth., be short of something"; !menezyin is in texts manezi can be found in OPD
znag'iinan:zanagihiin    VAIO_TAG    " 1 struggle with something [manipulable by hand]" ; !Rand key:n103000789306n from post 2016 entries, UR informed by OPD

LEXICON VAIO_TAG
+VAIO:0     VAIO_ORDERS_GET ;

LEXICON VTA_INVERSE_ONLY_SET
@P.Theme.Inv@   VTA_TAG ; 

LEXICON VTA_NAA_MANAGEMENT
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@  VTA_NAA_THEME ;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person.2@  VTA_NAA_INDEP_THEME_SECOND_PERSON ; 
@D.Person@                  VTA_NAA_NON_INDEP_GET ; 
@D.Person.3@                VTA_NAA_PRE_DETRANSITIVE ;
0:in1                       VTA_INFLECTIONAL_PASSIVE ; !fixing enind. OPD gives indigoo, which indicates we are on firm ground making in1 be present for all passives
!OPD gives idiwag and idizo for the reciprocal and reflexive, so the null theme also happens with derivational morphemes

LEXICON VTA_NAA_THEME
+ThmDir:in1aa    VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_GATEWAY    " 1 say something to smb., tell smb. something;  2 refer to smb., say something about smb." ; !Rand key:n73033330730n
+ThmInv:igo    VTA_INDEP_THEME_INVERSE_SET    " 1 say something to smb., tell smb. something;  2 refer to smb., say something about smb." ; !Rand key:n73033330730n

LEXICON VTA_NAA_INDEP_THEME_SECOND_PERSON 
0:in1    VTA_INDEP_THEME_SECOND_PERSON " 1 say something to smb., tell smb. something;  2 refer to smb., say something about smb." ; !Rand key:n73033330730n

LEXICON VTA_NAA_NON_INDEP_GET
@D.Order.Cnj@       VTA_NAA_IMPER ; 
!DUPLICATED FROM VTA_CNJ_THM (plus in1), EXCEPT FOR IGO (no in1)
+Cnj+ThmDir:in1aa      THMDIR_NEG ; !1pl v 3pl
+Cnj+Thm2b:in1%>ik          THM2B_3 ; 
+Cnj+ThmNul:in1       THMNUL_LOC ; 
+Cnj+ThmNul:in1aaw      THMNUL_AA_LOC ; !w likely epenthetic
+Cnj+Thm2a+Neg:in1isin  THM2A_NEG_FRAG ; 
+Cnj+Thm2a:in1%>inin  THM2A_POS_LOC ; 
+Cnj+Thm1Pl2:in1%>igoo     THM1PL_NEG ;
+Cnj+ThmInv:igo     THMINV_NEG ; !NULL STEM SPECIFIED HERE!
+Cnj+Thm1:in1i2        THM1_NEG ;

LEXICON VTA_NAA_IMPER
0:in1    VTA_IMPER_TAG     " 1 say something to smb., tell smb. something;  2 refer to smb., say something about smb." ; !Rand key:n73033330730n

LEXICON VII_DEF
aanwendaagot:aanawendaagod2   VII_TAG    " 1 be distasteful, be unsatisfactory, be worthless" ; !Rand key:n72973462406n ![gk]Vo1 replaced with [gk]o
biigshkaa:biigoshkaa    VII_TAG    " 1 break, break down" ; !Rand2key:n72977244454n
boonbiisaa:boonibiisaa    VII_TAG    " 1 stop raining" ; !Rand2key:n72988142813n
dpakii:dapakii    VII_TAG    " 1 sprout  (of plants)" ; !Rand2key:n73036253886n
giizhgaate:giizhigaate    VII_TAG    " 1 be bright moonlight" ; !Rand2key:n73023780468n
Jibwesin:ojibwesin    VII_TAG    " 1 be written in Chippewa, be written in Ojibwa, be written in Ojibway" ; !Rand2key:n73028341560n
miishaatesin:miishaatesin    VII_TAG    " 1 be fuzzy, show a fuzzy picture (of televisions)" ; !Rand2key:n7304646225n
n'go'gaade:nVi1ngohigaade    VII_TAG    " 1 be buried" ; !Rand2key:n71431656920n ![gk]Vo1 replaced with [gk]o
shpashkaa:Vi1shpashkaa    VII_TAG    " 1 be high grass" ; !Rand2key:n73031512356n
zhooshkdamat:zhooshkadamVa1d2   VII_TAG    " 1 be slippery (of roads)" ; !Rand key:n73035430303n
bwaasjigaade:bawaasijigaade    VII_TAG    " 1 be winnowed" ; !Rand2key:n201612214-54-38n
LEXICON VAI_DAB_ADDITIONS
sweb'idwak:zaswebah    VAI_MANDATORY_RECIPROCAL    " 1 disperse [running], scatter [running]" ; !Rand key:n73071453360n
maajiib'idwak:maajiibah    VAI_MANDATORY_RECIPROCAL    " 1 run off together in a group" ; !Rand key:n73032731795n
zaagdaawnidwak:zaagidaawani    VAI_MANDATORY_RECIPROCAL    " 1 march out, parade out, go out" ; !Rand key:n73032712330n there is a plausible groupness, hence reciprocal, but I wouldn't want to make a VTA for a base for this
bgamaapnendwak:bagamaapinen    VAI_MANDATORY_RECIPROCAL    " 1 arrive quarrelling" ; !Rand key:n201611118-36-49n
maawnji'diwak:maawanjih    VAI_MANDATORY_RECIPROCAL    " 1 assemble, gather, meet" ; !Rand key:n71429266400n
biindgeyaawnidwak:biindigeyaawani    VAI_MANDATORY_RECIPROCAL    " 1 march in, parade in" ; !Rand key:n73101868871n
webiichge:webiichige    VAI_OPTIONAL_RECIPROCAL    " 1 race one another, race" ; !dict actually lists the reciprocal webiichgedwak Rand key:n73032713123n but we derive it on the model of niimi/niim'idwak 
ggwen'gan:gagwenagan    VAI_OPTIONAL_RECIPROCAL    " 1 race against each other, race" ; !Rand key:n201622417-20-39n
gdimaagi-n'kweshkdaadwak:gidimaagi-nakweshkodaa    VAI_MANDATORY_RECIPROCAL    " 1 meet each other both in poor circumstances" ; !Rand key:n201622213-20-12n (n'kweshkwaa 'meet smb', but another mystery odaa
aabjinnidwak:aabijinani    VAI_MANDATORY_RECIPROCAL    " 1 fight each other constantly, fight with each other constantly" ; !Rand key:n72972555233n
samnaadwak:asaminaa    VAI_MANDATORY_RECIPROCAL    " 1 play a close game" ; !Rand key:n73033956512n
mnwaaksa'diwak:minwaakVv1sah    VAI_MANDATORY_RECIPROCAL    " 1 get along well with each other, hit it off" ; !Rand key:n73045653010n (nothing really with mnaak/mnwaak, some mnaag/mnwaag)
naanzge:inaanzige    VAI_TAG    " 1 paint things a certain colour" ; !Rand key:n103000695941n
LEXICON VAI
baashjibza:baashijibizo    VAI_TAG    " 1 drive past one's destination, fly past one's destination, go past one's destination, drive past a boundary" ; !Rand key:n73001149112n
bmishkaa:bVv1mishkaa    VAI_TAG    " 1 come off, become detached" ; !Rand key:n72978052351n
gaagiijganzhii:gaagiijiganzhii    VAI_TAG    " 1 have a sore nail" ; !Rand key:n73016046307n
gtimi:gitimi    VAI_TAG    " 1 be lazy" ; !Rand key:n73031617241n
mendaagzi:mendaagozi    VAI_TAG    " 1 be supposed to" ; !Rand key:n71429641339n
nawaatwe:anawaatwe    VAI_TAG    " 1 have one's lights reflect in clouds" ; !Rand key:n73033614163n
shange:ashange    VAI_TAG    " 1 feed people" ; !Rand key:n7303407377n
zhaawshkozi:ozhaawashkozi    VAI_TAG    " 1 be blue, be green" ; !Rand key:n73033514964n !TRUNCATED VERSION REMOVED, see otw/debugging/candidates_for_spellrelax_rules.txt
biindgeyaasge:biindigeyaasige    VAI_TAG    " 1 [sun] shine in, [moon] shine in" ; !Rand key:n20161149-43-55n
aakmendam:aakVv1men     VAI_ENDAM_CONTINUATION    " 1 be mindful of things, be on the watch" ; !Rand key:n72973063711n
bgwisendam:bagwisen     VAI_ENDAM_CONTINUATION    " 1 [see bgosendam]" ; !Rand key:n72976865470n
dekwendam:dekwen     VAI_ENDAM_CONTINUATION    " 1 be under mental stress" ; !Rand key:n73002755348n
ggwaan'sagendam:gagwaanisagen     VAI_ENDAM_CONTINUATION    " 1 be greatly distressed, be anguished, be horrified (about something);  2 " ; !Rand key:n73020959408n
gwekendam:gweken     VAI_ENDAM_CONTINUATION    " 1 change one's mind" ; !Rand key:n7303179461n
maajiiyendam:maajiiyen     VAI_ENDAM_CONTINUATION    " 1 get it into one's mind to leave" ; !Rand key:n73098672231n
miidaawendam:miidaawen     VAI_ENDAM_CONTINUATION    " 1 [see mmiidaawendam]" ; !Rand key:n73096950145n
mnwendam:minwen     VAI_ENDAM_CONTINUATION    " 1 [see mnendam]" ; !Rand key:n71430355068n
nitaa-wnendam:nitaa-Vo1nen     VAI_ENDAM_CONTINUATION    " 1 be forgetful" ; !Rand key:n71433038727n
znagendam:zanagen     VAI_ENDAM_CONTINUATION    " 1 find things difficult, find things problematic" ; !Rand key:n73035813235n
niimi:niimi    VAI_OPTIONAL_RECIPROCAL    " 1 dance" ; !Rand key:n71431757399n
LEXICON VAIO
bnaajtaagen:bVi1naajitaage    VAIO_TAG    "1 ruin something belonging to someone, spoil something belonging to someone" ; !Rand key:n72978060323n
dnaagen:dVv1naage    VAIO_TAG    "1 use something as a serving dish" ; !Rand key:n73101884435n
gindmaagen:agindamaage    VAIO_TAG    "1 count something [for people];  2 read something [for people]" ; !Rand key:n73024438441n
jiigaakshkamaagen:jiigaakVv1shkamaage    VAIO_TAG    "1 scrape something belonging to another [by bumping alongside it]" ; !Rand key:n73032647877n
mkandwen:makandwe    VAIO_TAG    "1 seize something, snatch something, take something from somebody by force; rob somebody of something" ; !Rand key:n71429747776n
ndawzin:nandawizi    VAIO_TAG    "1 try and get something, try and obtain something" ; !Rand key:n71431442774n
nokaazan:anokaazo    VAIO_TAG    "1 [see nakaazan]" ; !Rand key:n73099370069n
pakwen:apakwe    VAIO_TAG    "1 use something as roofing material" ; !Rand key:n73031112351n
waabndamaagen:waabandamaage    VAIO_TAG    "1 see something belonging to smb." ; !Rand key:n73032184009n
baapiiwdaawen:baapiiwadaawe    VAIO_TAG    "1 sell out all one’s stock;  2 spend all one’s money" ; !Rand key:n20161913-12-19n
LEXICON VTA_DAB_ADDITIONS 
sosnaamshkaagon:azosVv1naamVv1shkaw        VTA_INVERSE_ONLY_SET    " 1 be made to cough by sth." ; !Rand key:n7303211291n
gshkikaagon:gBv1shkikaw        VTA_INVERSE_ONLY_SET    " 1 be affected by sth. [ingested], be affected by sth. [that one is struck by]" ; !Rand key:n7303275727n
ggwetaan'kaak:gagwetaanikaw        VTA_INVERSE_ONLY_SET    " 1 be knocked off one's feet [by sth. (an.) ingested]" ; !Rand key:n73021179326n
giigdashkaagon:giigidashkaw        VTA_INVERSE_ONLY_SET    " 1 be made talkative by sth. ingested, sth. ingested make one talkative" ; !Rand key:n20162257-18-17n
bsidyeshkaagon:bisidiyeshkaw        VTA_INVERSE_ONLY_SET    " 1 be affected by something imbibed, feel a sharp stimulant effect from sth. imbibed, get a kick from sth. imbibed" ; !Rand key:n201612117-5-3n
mzhikaagon:mizhikaw        VTA_INVERSE_ONLY_SET    " 1 be hurt by sth., be adversely affected by sth." ; !Rand key:n73033328006n
maan'kaagon:maanikaw        VTA_INVERSE_ONLY_SET    " 1 be made ill by sth., be made sick by sth." ; !Rand key:n73032750542n
bookwaabdeshkaagon:bookwaabideshkaw        VTA_INVERSE_ONLY_SET    " 1 have one's tooth broken by sth." ; !Rand key:n72980780311n
biijbii'mawaa:biijibiihamaw        VTA_INVERSE_ONLY_SET    " 1 write a letter to smb. (verb not used of letter to be mailed out, commonly in inflections that have 1st or 2nd person goal, or 3rd person goal if writer is 4th person)" ; !Rand key:n72977248974n
baapaagjiishkaagon:baapaagVv1jiishkaw        VTA_INVERSE_ONLY_SET    " 1 be given gas pains [by sth. ingested]" ; !Rand key:n73032653465n
LEXICON VTA
naa+VTA:0       VTA_NAA_MANAGEMENT ; !managing 0-stem in independent order inverse
